Utah statutes.
53A-1-1109.   Calculation of percent of maximum points earned.

(1)  The percent of the maximum number of points a school that is not a high school may earn shall be calculated by:

(a)  dividing the sum of the points earned for the criteria listed in Sections 53A-1-1106 and 53A-1-1107 by the maximum number of points that a school may earn as provided in Sections 53A-1-1106 and 53A-1-1107; and

(b)  multiplying the quotient calculated under Subsection (1)(a) by 100.

(2)  The percent of the maximum number of points a high school may earn shall be calculated by:

(a)  dividing the sum of the points earned for the criteria listed in Sections 53A-1-1106, 53A-1-1107, and 53A-1-1108 by the maximum number of points that a school may earn as provided in Sections 53A-1-1106, 53A-1-1107, and 53A-1-1108; and

(b)  multiplying the quotient calculated under Subsection (2)(a) by 100.

